Maine, session 132, LD1665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§1, ¶A-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 523, Pt.
B, §4, is further amended to read:
A-1. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2018 but not later than December
31, 2024, "benefit base" means property taxes paid by a resident individual or the
bureau pursuant to chapter 908 on behalf of the resident individual during the tax year
on the resident individual's homestead in this State or rent constituting property taxes
paid by the resident individual during the tax year on a homestead in the State not
exceeding the following amounts:
(1) For persons filing as single individuals, $2,050;
(2) For persons filing as heads of households that can claim the federal child tax
credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for no more than one qualifying child or
dependent or for persons filing joint returns, $2,650;
(3) For persons filing as heads of households that can claim the federal child tax
credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for more than one qualifying child or
dependent or for persons filing joint returns that can claim the federal child tax
credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for at least one qualifying child or
dependent, $3,250; and
(4) For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, notwithstanding
subparagraphs (1), (2) and (3), for individuals 65 years of age or older, $4,000.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§1, ¶A-2 is enacted to read:
A-2. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, "benefit base" means property
taxes paid by a resident individual or the bureau pursuant to chapter 908 on behalf of
the resident individual during the tax year on the resident individual's homestead in this
State or rent constituting property taxes paid by the resident individual during the tax
year on a homestead in the State not exceeding the following amounts:
(1) For individuals filing as single individuals, $2,450;
(2) For individuals filing joint returns, $3,200;
(3) For individuals filing as heads of households or filing joint returns and who can
claim the federal child tax credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for no more than
one qualifying child or dependent, $3,250;
(4) For individuals filing as heads of households or filing joint returns and who can
claim the federal child tax credit pursuant to the Code, Section 24 for more than
one qualifying child or dependent, $4,250; and
(5) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (1) to (4), for individuals who are 65 years of
age or older, $4,250.
Sec. 3. 36 MRSA §5219-KK, sub-§2-D, as amended by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. S,
§4, is further amended to read:
2-D. Credit in 2022 and after. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2022,
a resident individual is allowed a credit against the taxes imposed under this Part equal to
the amount by which the benefit base for the resident individual exceeds 4% of the resident
Page 1 - 132LR1107(01)

412 individual's income. The credit may not exceed $1,000 for resident individuals under 65
423 years of age as of the last day of the taxable year or, for tax years beginning before January
434 1, 2024, $1,500 for resident individuals 65 years of age and older as of the last day of the
445 taxable year. For tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, for resident individuals
456 65 years of age and older, the credit may not exceed $2,000. For tax years beginning on or
467 after January 1, 2025, for resident individuals filing as heads of households or joint returns
478 as described in subsection 1, paragraph A-2, subparagraph (3) or (4), the credit may not
489 exceed $2,000. In the case of married individuals filing a joint return, only one spouse is
590 required to be 65 years of age or older to qualify for the $1,500 or $2,000 credit limitation.
1501 Married taxpayers filing separate returns do not qualify for the credit under this section.
Sec. 4. Study of property tax fairness credit. The Department of Administrative
and Financial Services, Bureau of Revenue Services, referred to in this section as "the
bureau," shall convene a working group, referred to in this section as "the working group,"
to study the property tax fairness credit established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 36,
section 5219-KK, referred to this section as "the credit," and make recommendations on
how to make the credit easier to understand and simplify the process for applying for the
credit.
1. In undertaking the study required by this section, the bureau shall seek input from
the following entities or individuals:
A. Advocates working with low-income individuals in the State to assist those
individuals in filing taxes;
B. Advocates representing low-income individuals in the State;
C. Advocates representing the interests of children;
D. Individuals who have attempted to or successfully claimed the credit within the last
5 years;
E. Advocates representing the interests and needs of individuals 65 years of age or
older;
F. Advocates representing the legal needs of individuals 65 years of age or older; and
G. Representatives of municipal officials and municipal governments.
2. The goal of the study is to provide better information to taxpayers regarding the
credit, including the availability of, eligibility standards for and methods of applying for
and claiming the credit. To meet this goal, the working group shall consider:
A. Streamlining eligibility criteria;
B. How to simplify the calculation of the credit, especially the determination of the
benefit base and credit and make the benefit amount easier to predict, calculate and
understand for an average individual. The working group shall consider eliminating,
restructuring or replacing the use of the benefit base in performing the calculation; and
C. Using income brackets to determine benefit amounts, instead of the benefit base or
threshold.
3. The bureau shall report the findings and recommendations of the working group,
including any implementing legislation, to the Joint Standing Committee on Taxation by
Page 2 - 132LR1107(01)

412 December 3, 2025. The joint standing committee may report out legislation related to the
423 report to the Second Regular Session of the 132nd Legislature.